enhu2.foma
# mész->meszet ész->eszet
define HarmRuleAccoaee §oeoez42§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy %^ _  .o.
                 §oeoez42§ -> 0 //  Vowel [ n y | l y ]   %^ _ .o.
#                §oeoez42§ -> 0 //  Vowel [ n y | l y | z s ] AccSingle  %^ _ .o.
                 §oeoez42§ -> 0 //  [ Nodupy ]  y  %^ _ .o.
                 §oeoez42§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez42§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez42§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* _ ;
# mész->mészt ész->észt
define HarmRuleAccoaee43 §oeoez43§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy %^ _  .o.
                 §oeoez43§ -> 0 //  Vowel [ n y | l y | s z | z ]   %^ _ .o.
#                §oeoez43§ -> 0 //  Vowel [ n y | l y | s z | z | z s ] AccSingle  %^ _ .o.
                 §oeoez43§ -> 0 //  [ Nodupy ]  y  %^ _ .o.
                 §oeoez43§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez43§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez43§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePlur §oeoez1§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?*  _  .o.
                 §oeoez1§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?*  _ ,,
                 §oeoez1§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez1§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePlury §oeoez1y§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithyy %^ ?*  _  .o.
                 §oeoez1y§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?*  _ ,,
                 §oeoez1y§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez1y§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePlurmagas §oeoez1magas§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* [ Vowel | Cons y] %^ ?*  _  .o.
                 §oeoez1magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?*  _ ,,
                 §oeoez1magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez1magas§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePluroa §oeoez11§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?*  _  .o.
                 §oeoez11§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?*  _ ,,
                 §oeoez11§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez11§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePluroaoe §oeoez15§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?*  _  .o.
                 §oeoez15§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?*  _ ,,
                 §oeoez15§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez15§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;

define HarmRulePluroamely §oeoez21§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?*  _  .o.
                 §oeoez21§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel+ "^" ?*  _ ;
define HarmRulePlurmely §oeoez17§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?*  _  .o.
                 §oeoez17§ -> o // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel+ "^" ?*  _ ;
define HarmRulePlurmely18 §oeoez18§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?*  _  .o.
                 §oeoez18§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel+ "^" ?*  _ ;
define HarmRulePluroe §oeoez5§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?*  _  .o.
                 §oeoez5§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?*  _ ,,
                 §oeoez5§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez5§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJfi §J1§ -> j || .#. \"^"*  %^ ?* _ ,,
                  §J1§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"*  %^ ?* _ ;
##########################################################
#  ja/e ae
# b,d,f: - ja/je
# g,k,l,m,n,p,r,t,v,  ny, gy, ty - ja/e és a/e 
# c,h,j,s,z, sz,zs, cs - a/e
###########################################################

# sültje
define HarmRuleJ §J§ -> j || .#. \"^"* [ Vowelwithy | ConsJaje ] %^ ?* _ .o.
                 §J§ -> j || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje %^ ?* _ ,,
                 §J§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje %^ ?* _ .o.
                 §J§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* ConsAe %^ ?* _ .o.
                 §J§ -> j || .#. \"^"* Cons %^ ?* _ ;

define HarmRuleJy §Jy§ -> j || .#. \"^"* [ Vowelwithyy | ConsJaje ] %^ ?* _ .o.
                 §Jy§ -> j || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje %^ ?* _ ,,
                 §Jy§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje %^ ?* _ .o.
                 §Jy§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* ConsAe %^ ?* _ ;
